Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 6.4
COLORADO NURSE HOME VISITOR PROGRAM

26-6.4-101 to 26-6.4-108. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article repealed, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 870, § 135, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article 6.4 was added in 2013. For amendments to this article 6.4 prior to its repeal in 2022, consult the 2021 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. This article 6.4 was relocated to part 5 of article 3 of title 26.5. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article 6.4, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.